Massachusetts, session 194th, S2453.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2 of Chapter 90 of the general laws are hereby amended by removing the
sixteenth paragraph and inserting in its place the following:-
The registrar shall furnish to owners of private passenger motor vehicles who are
veterans as defined in said clause Forty-third of said section seven of said chapter four who have
been awarded the Purple Heart and upon evidence deemed satisfactory by the registrar,
distinctive registration plates bearing the image of a Purple Heart Medal for any private
passenger motor vehicle or motorcycle owned by such Purple Heart recipient. The first set of
such registration plates issued to an eligible veteran must be furnished at no charge. The registrar
may charge the established registration fee for private passenger motor vehicles or motorcycles
for each additional set of such registration plates or emblems.
of 1